Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 9

Law Enforcement Officer Training and Standards

Subchapter 1

— Commission on
Standards and Training

Effective Dates. Acts 1975, No. 452, § 13: Jan. 1, 1976.

Acts 1979, No. 642, § 3: Mar. 28, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present law relating to minimum standards for law enforcement officers a temporary or probationary employment may not be extended beyond one year; that this has created a serious hardship in some instances and it is urgent that some provision be made for permitting the extension of such temporary or probationary employment beyond one year in unusual circumstances and that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 45, § 15: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the agencies, departments, and programs now performed through the Department of Public Safety could more efficiently and economically perform their respective duties and responsibilities through reorganized agencies and departments operating as separate entities; that substantial savings could be made by eliminating the central services of the Department of Public Safety; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to provide for advance planning for more efficient administration after the close of the current fiscal biennium of the various public safety programs of this state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1981, No. 427, § 8: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1981 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1981 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1983, No. 89, § 6: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, Nos. 131 and 135, § 6: Feb. 10, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that state boards and commissions exist for the singular purpose of protecting the public health and welfare; that citizens over 60 years of age represent a significant percentage of the population; that it is necessary and proper that the older population be represented on such boards and commissions; that the operations of the boards and commissions have a profound effect on the daily lives of older Arkansans; and that the public voice of older citizens should not be muted as questions coming before such bodies. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 763, § 3: Mar. 24, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is confusion over the authority of municipal inspectors to issue citations for the violation of municipal codes, ordinances, and regulations. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 905, § 3: Mar. 28, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “With knowledge that there are law enforcement officers presently appointed or employed in this state who have been convicted of felony offenses and that there is ambiguity in the law with respect to what constitutes a conviction, and that the law enforcement officer is in a high position of public trust, and that this act is necessary for the protection of the public peace, health, and safety, this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 44, § 5: Nov. 8, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that actions by law enforcement officers are being held invalid merely because the law enforcement officers fail to meet all law enforcement standards; that as a result, prosecution of many criminals is being thwarted; that criminals should not go unpunished merely because a law enforcement officer fails to meet all standards prescribed by the State; that this Act eliminates the language which invalidates action taken by such law enforcement officers; and that this Act should go into effect immediately in order to protect the safety and welfare of the citizens of this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 179, § 38: Feb. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1203, § 8: Apr. 8, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Police Corps Program and Police Corps Scholarship Program, which are operated in large part under federal grants, do not conform with federal requirements and that failure to take immediate appropriate action could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of these programs. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1022, § 13: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1999 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1999 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1247, § 5: Apr. 8, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that it is essential to the effective and efficient administration and enforcement of parking ordinances in municipalities that such municipalities be permitted to employ enforcement personnel who do not meet the certification requirements of the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards or to contract for such services by noncertified enforcement personnel; that this act is designed to permit municipalities to employ or contract for the services and should be given effect immediately to enable municipalities to provide for the proper enforcement of such ordinances. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 509, § 2: Mar. 18, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current law enforcement training standards do not require adequate training concerning sexual assault; that this bill requires such additional training; and that this bill is immediately necessary in order to provide the necessary training to our law enforcement officers as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2018, No. 202, § 12: July 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

12-9-101. Legislative determinations.

The General Assembly finds and determines that:

The administration of criminal justice is of statewide concern and that law enforcement is important to the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state;

The state has a responsibility to ensure effective law enforcement by establishing minimum selection, training, and educational requirements for law enforcement officers and also to encourage advanced in-service training programs; and

It is in the public interest that minimum levels of education and training be developed and made available to persons seeking to become law enforcement officers and to persons presently serving as law enforcement officers.

Cited: City of Little Rock v. Tibbett, 301 Ark. 376, 784 S.W.2d 163 (1990); Johnson v. City of Kensett, 301 Ark. 592, 787 S.W.2d 651 (1990); Renshaw v. State, 303 Ark. 244, 795 S.W.2d 925 (1990); City of Pocahontas v. Huddleston, 309 Ark. 353, 831 S.W.2d 138 (1992).

History.

Acts 1975, No. 452, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1001n.

12-9-102. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Law enforcement agency” means:

A private college or university law enforcement agency as described in § 12-20-101 et seq.;

The Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training and the Black River Technical College Law Enforcement Training Academy as designated under § 12-9-210; and

Any other entity designated by law as a law enforcement agency;

“Law enforcement officer” means an appointed law enforcement officer who is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this state, excluding only those officers who are elected by a vote of the people; and

“Political subdivision” means any county, municipality, township, or other specific local unit of general government.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted former (1); added present (1); and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” in (1)(B).

Cross References. Railroad police, §23-12-701 et seq.

An appointed chief of police is a law enforcement officer, within the statutory definition, because he is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the criminal, traffic, or highway laws of this state. Allen v. Titsworth, 279 Ark. 138, 649 S.W.2d 185 (1983).

The mere fact that employees of a police department are uniformed and wear badges does not automatically convert them into law enforcement officers. City of Pocahontas v. Huddleston, 309 Ark. 353, 831 S.W.2d 138 (1992).

Cited: Lamb v. State, 21 Ark. App. 111, 730 S.W.2d 252 (1987); Credit v. State, 25 Ark. App. 309, 758 S.W.2d 10 (1988).

History.

Acts 1975, No. 452, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1001; Acts 1989, No. 25, § 2; 2017, No. 497, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5809.

12-9-103. Commission created — Members — Meetings — Director.

The members of the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall consist of ten (10) members, to be appointed by the Governor with the advice and approval of the Senate.

Two (2) members of the commission shall be chiefs of police of municipalities in Arkansas, two (2) members of the commission shall be county sheriffs of counties in this state, one (1) member shall be an officer of the Division of Arkansas State Police, two (2) members shall be appointed to represent the public, one (1) member shall be an educator in the field of criminal justice, and one (1) member shall represent the Arkansas Municipal Police Association.

Each congressional district of the state shall be represented on the commission, with the remaining members to be appointed from the state at large.

One (1) member shall not be actively engaged in or retired from law enforcement.

The member under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall be:

At least sixty (60) years of age and shall represent the elderly;

Appointed from the state at large subject to confirmation by the Senate; and

A full voting member.

Members shall be appointed for terms of seven (7) years or until their successors are appointed and qualified.

If a vacancy occurs on the commission due to death, resignation, or for other reason, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the Governor, in the same manner as provided for the initial appointment for the position, for the remainder of the unexpired portion of the term thereof.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation but may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

The commission shall meet at such times as may be provided by the rules of the commission, or upon call of the chair, or upon written request of any four (4) members.

Upon recommendation of the commission, the Governor shall appoint the Director of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training, who shall perform such duties as may be directed by the commission and who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety.

Publisher's Notes. In addition to enacting the general and permanent provisions codified in this section, Acts 1981, No. 45, § 7, abolished the Executive Commission on Law Enforcement Standards, which was created by Acts 1975, No. 452, § 5, and transferred all its powers, functions, duties, personnel, and funds to the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

It further provided that the act should not be construed so as to reduce any right which an employee of the Executive Commission on Law Enforcement Standards would have under any civil service or merit system.

The terms of the members of the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Training and Standards, other than the representative of the elderly, are arranged so that one (1) term expires on January 14 of each year.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “ten (10)” for “nine (9)” in (a); in (b), inserted “one (1) member shall be an officer of the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(1)(A), inserted “under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section” in (b)(2)(B); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment, in (b)(3), inserted “or his or her designee” and deleted “during his or her term of office as president of the association, and his or her successors shall likewise serve as full voting members of the commission” at the end; and deleted “Except for the president of the Arkansas Municipal Police Association” at the beginning of (c).

The 2017 amendment by No. 250 substituted “At least sixty (60)” for “Sixty (60)” in (b)(2)(B)(i).

The 2017 amendment by No. 497 inserted “members of the” in (a); in (b)(1)(A), inserted “and one (1) member shall represent the Arkansas Municipal Police Association”; substituted “At least sixty (60)” for “Sixty (60)” in (b)(2)(B)(i); and deleted (b)(3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(1)(A); and redesignated (g) as (g)(1), substituted “Director of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards andTraining” for “Director of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” in (g)(1), and added (g)(2).

Cited: Lamb v. State, 21 Ark. App. 111, 730 S.W.2d 252 (1987).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 45, § 7; 1983, No. 131, §§ 1-3, 5; 1983, No. 135, §§ 1-3, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 6-623 — 6-626, 42-701.1; Acts 1993, No. 109, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 65; 2009, No. 205, § 1; 2011, No. 283, § 1; 2017, No. 250, § 2; 2017, No. 497, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5810, 5811.

12-9-104. Commission's powers generally.

In addition to powers conferred upon the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training elsewhere in this subchapter, the commission may:

Promulgate rules for the administration of this subchapter.

The rules promulgated by the commission shall not go into full force and effect until the commission seeks the advice of the Legislative Council and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the Legislative Council and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;

Require the submission of reports and information by police departments within this state;

Establish minimum selection and training standards for admission to employment as a law enforcement officer or as a private college or university law enforcement officer.

The minimum selection and training standards may take into account different requirements for urban and rural areas, full-time and part-time employment, and specialized police personnel;

Establish minimum curriculum requirements for preparatory, in-service, and advanced courses and programs of schools operated by or for the state and political subdivisions for the specific purpose of training recruits as law enforcement officers;

Consult and cooperate with counties, municipalities, agencies of this state, other governmental agencies, and with universities, colleges, junior colleges, community colleges, and other institutions or organizations concerning the development of police training schools and programs or courses of instruction;

Approve institutions and facilities to be used by or for the state or any political subdivision of the state for the specific purpose of training law enforcement officers and recruits;

Adopt rules and minimum standards for schools, including without limitation:

The curriculum for:

Probationary police officers, which shall be offered by all certified schools, including without limitation courses on:

Accident investigation;

Arrest;

Civil rights;

Court testimonies;

Criminal law;

Firearms training;

First aid;

Handling of juvenile offenders;

Human relations;

Law of criminal procedure;

Law of evidence;

Physical training;

Race relations and sensitivity;

Recognition of mental conditions that require immediate assistance and methods to safeguard and provide assistance to a person in need of mental treatment;

Reports;

Search and seizure;

Statements;

Techniques of obtaining physical evidence;

Traffic control; and

Vehicle and traffic law; and

Amendments. The 2005 amendment added (14) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment added (15) and (16).

The 2013 amendment by No. 168 added (17).

The 2013 amendment by No. 227 added “or as a private college or university law enforcement officer” at the end of (3)(A)(i).

The 2013 amendment by No. 551 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (1)(A) and (1)(B); inserted “minimum selection and training” in (3)(A)(ii); substituted “training recruits as” for “training recruits for”in (4); rewrote the introductory language of (7) and the introductory language of (7)(A)(i) and (ii); deleted “the provisions of” preceding “this subchapter” in (11); substituted “the commission's” for “its” in (12); deleted “United States” preceding “Department of Homeland Security” in (14); added (17) (now (18)); and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (3)(A)(i) and (ii) as (3)(A) and (3)(B); deleted former (3)(B); substituted “Certified” for “Permanent” in the introductory language of (7)(A)(ii); substituted “certification” for “permanent employment” in (7)(D); deleted former (17); redesignated former (18) as (17); substituted “19-6-821” for “19-6-819” in (17); and added present (18).

Cited: Gilbert v. City of Little Rock, 544 F. Supp. 1231 (E.D. Ark. 1982); Lamb v. State, 21 Ark. App. 111, 730 S.W.2d 252 (1987).

Certified police officers, including without limitation refresher and in-service training in:

Any of the courses listed in subdivision (7)(A)(i) of this section;

Advanced courses in any of the subjects listed in subdivision (7)(A)(i) of this section;

Training for supervisory personnel; and

Specialized training in subjects and fields to be selected by the commission;

Minimum courses of study, attendance requirements, and equipment requirements;

Minimum requirements for instructors; and

Minimum basic training requirements that a probationary police officer must satisfactorily complete before being eligible for certification as a law enforcement officer;

Make and encourage studies of any aspect of police administration;

Conduct and stimulate research by public and private agencies designed to improve police administration and law enforcement;

Make recommendations concerning matters within its purview pursuant to this subchapter;

Make evaluations as may be necessary to determine if governmental units are complying with this subchapter;

Adopt and amend bylaws, consistent with law, for the commission's internal management and control;

Enter into contracts or do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the administration of this subchapter;

Facilitate training of certified law enforcement officers pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between the State of Arkansas and the United States Department of Justice or the United States Department of Homeland Security concerning the enforcement of federal immigration laws;

In consultation with the Arkansas Association of Chiefs of Police, develop and implement suggested selection and training requirements and nonmandatory basic and advanced levels of certification for chiefs of police;

In consultation with the Arkansas Sheriffs' Association, develop and implement suggested training requirements and nonmandatory basic and advanced levels of certification for county sheriffs;

Adopt rules to implement §§14-15-309 and19-6-821; and

Impose administrative penalties against a law enforcement agency or governmental entity for violations of commission rules as permitted under §12-9-120.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 452, § 6; 1981, No. 427, § 4; 1983, No. 89, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-701.2, 42-1005; Acts 1993, No. 110, § 1; 1997, No. 179, § 8; 2005, No. 907, § 2; 2009, No. 793, § 1; 2013, No. 168, § 1; 2013, No. 227, § 1; 2013, No. 551, § 2; 2017, No. 497, § 4.

12-9-105. Employees.

The Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training may employ such employees as are necessary to efficiently and effectively carry out this subchapter and as may be authorized by appropriations of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 452, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-1006; Acts 2011, No. 779, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 5812.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted “biennial” preceding “appropriations”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards andTraining” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training”.